Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
ARTICLE 4
COLORADO ANTITRUST ACT OF 1992

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 4 of chapter 55, C.R.S. 1963. The substantive provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1992, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1992, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Law reviews:

For article, "The 1992

C

olorado Antitrust Act: Per Se Bidrigging and Key Issues", see 22

C

olo. Law. 2229 (1993); for article, "The Colorado Antitrust Act of 1992", see 22 Colo. Law. 695 (1993); for article, "Antitrust Questions and Answers: A Primer for Practitioners", see 24 Colo. Law. 521 (1995); for article, "Criminal Enforcement of State and Federal Antitrust Laws", see 43 Colo. Law. 59 (Oct. 2014).

Section

6-4-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Antitrust Act of 1992".

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 236, § 1, effective July 1.

6-4-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and determines that competition is fundamental to the free market system and that the unrestrained interaction of competitive forces will yield the best allocation of our economic resources, the lowest prices, the highest quality commodities and services, and the greatest material progress, while at the same time providing an environment conducive to the preservation of our democratic, political, and social institutions.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 236, § 1, effective July 1.

6-4-103. Definitions.

"Commodity" includes, but is not limited to, any goods, merchandise, wares, produce, chose in action, land, articles of commerce, or any other tangible or intangible property, real, personal, or mixed, for use, consumption, production, enjoyment, or resale.

"Governmental or public entity" means the state and any of its departments, boards, agencies, instrumentalities, authorities, and commissions and any political subdivisions, including but not limited to counties, city and counties, municipalities, school districts, local improvement districts, law enforcement authorities, water, sanitation, fire protection, metropolitan, irrigation, drainage, or other special districts, and any other municipal, quasi-municipal, or public corporation organized pursuant to the constitution or other law, and any of the political subdivision's respective departments, boards, agencies, instrumentalities, authorities, and commissions.

"Person" includes any natural person, any firm, association, organization, business or other trust, company, corporation, joint venture, partnership, proprietorship, or other business entity, whether or not for profit, and any governmental or public entity.

"Service" includes, but is not limited to, any kind of activity performed in whole or in part for economic or noneconomic benefit.

"Trade or commerce" means any and all economic activity carried on wholly or partially in this state which involves or relates to any commodity or service.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 236, § 1, effective July 1.

6-4-104. Illegal restraint of trade or commerce.

Every contract, combination in the form of a trust or otherwise, or conspiracy in restraint of trade or commerce is illegal.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 237, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 6-4-101, as it existed prior to 1992.

6-4-105. Monopolization and attempt to monopolize.

It is illegal for any person to monopolize, attempt to monopolize, or combine or conspire with any other person to monopolize any part of trade or commerce.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 237, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 6-4-102, as it existed prior to 1992.

6-4-106. Bid-rigging.

It is illegal for any person to contract, combine, or conspire with any person to rig any bid, or any aspect of the bidding process, in any way related to the provision of any commodity or service.

For purposes of this section, each separate instance of bid-rigging shall constitute a separate violation of this section, regardless of whether a single conspiracy is found to exist encompassing more than one such violation.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 237, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 6-4-102, as it existed prior to 1992.

6-4-107. Mergers - acquisitions.

It is unlawful for any person engaged in trade or commerce to acquire, directly or indirectly, the whole or any part of the stock or other share capital, or to acquire the whole or any part of the assets, of another person engaged in trade or commerce where the effect of such acquisition may be to substantially lessen competition or may tend to create a monopoly.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit any person from acquiring stock of another person solely for investment purposes, so long as such acquisition of stock is not used, by voting or otherwise, to bring about, or to attempt to bring about, the substantial lessening of competition; nor shall anything in this section prohibit any person from causing the formation of subsidiary corporations or from owning and holding all or any part of the stock of such subsidiary corporation.

Repealed.

The attorney general shall not challenge the merger or acquisition of any bank or bank holding company by or with any other bank or bank holding company that is subject to the provisions of any of the federal banking laws, except as specifically provided in those laws.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 237, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(3) repealed, (SB 20-064), ch. 31, p. 104, § 1, effective September 14.

6-4-108. Exemptions.

The labor of a human being is not a commodity, service, or article of trade or commerce.

Nothing contained in this article shall be construed to forbid the existence and operation of labor, agricultural, or horticultural organizations, instituted for purposes of mutual help, or engaged in making collective sales or marketing for its members or shareholders, and not having capital stock or conducted for profit, or to forbid or restrain individual members of such organizations from lawfully carrying out the legitimate objects thereof.

A professional review committee constituted and conducting its reviews and activities in accordance with the provisions of part 2 of article 30 of title 12, or the members thereof, shall not be held nor construed to be illegal combinations or conspiracies in restraint of trade under this article 4.

Any person, activity, or conduct exempt or immune under the laws of this state or exempt or immune from the provisions of the federal antitrust laws shall be exempt or immune from the provisions of this article without regard to any monetary threshold imposed by federal law; except that nothing in this article shall be deemed to modify the specific provisions of part 4 of article 4 of title 10, C.R.S.

Nothing in this article shall prohibit or be construed to prohibit:

The formation of a cooperative health-care agreement that has been approved in whole or in part in accordance with the provisions of part 5 of article 1 of title 25.5, C.R.S.;

Any conduct or activity reasonably necessary and reasonably foreseeable to implement a board-approved cooperative health-care agreement or a decision or order issued by the cooperative health-care agreements board pursuant to part 5 of article 1 of title 25.5, C.R.S.;

The negotiation of or entering into any cooperative health-care agreement which is filed with the cooperative health-care agreements board; or

Community planning, discussions, or negotiations intended in good faith to culminate in a cooperative health-care agreement to be filed with the cooperative health-care agreements board. Such agreements, conduct, or activities shall not be held or construed to be illegal combinations or conspiracies in restraint of trade under this article.

Nothing in this article shall prohibit or be construed to prohibit the formation and operation of health-care coverage cooperatives or provider networks pursuant to part 3 of article 18 of this title or part 10 of article 16 of title 10, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 238, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(5) added, p. 1898, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(6) added, p. 1941, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(5)(a) and (5)(b) amended, p. 511, § 6, effective May 16.

L. 2004:

(6) amended, p. 1009, § 16, effective August 4.

L. 2019:

(3) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1645, § 14, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 6-4-103, as it existed prior to 1992.

6-4-109. Jurisdiction - venue.

Primary jurisdiction of any cause of action brought pursuant to this article shall be vested in the district courts of this state.

Any cause of action brought pursuant to this article may be brought in any judicial district in which said violation occurred, in which any injury was suffered, or in which any defendant resides.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 239, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 6-4-105, as it existed prior to 1992.

6-4-110. Civil discovery request.

When the attorney general has reasonable cause to believe that any person has engaged in or is engaging in a violation of any provision of this article or of any provision of the federal antitrust statutes that may be enforced by the attorney general, the attorney general may:

Request such person to file a statement or report in writing, under oath or otherwise, on forms prescribed by the attorney general, or to answer in writing, under oath or otherwise, any questions propounded by the attorney general, as to all facts and circumstances reasonably related to the alleged violation and to provide any other data and information the attorney general reasonably deems to be necessary;

Issue subpoenas to require the attendance of witnesses or the production of relevant documents, administer oaths, conduct hearings in aid of an investigation or inquiry, and prescribe such forms and promulgate such rules as may reasonably be deemed to be necessary to administer the provisions of this section; and

Make true copies, at the expense of the attorney general, of any documents examined pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), which copies may be offered into evidence in lieu of the originals thereof in any civil action brought pursuant to this article. The person producing the documents may require that the attorney general make copies of the documents. If the attorney general determines the use of originals is necessary, the attorney general shall pay to have copies of those documents made for use by the person producing the documents.

Service of any request or subpoena shall be made in the manner prescribed by law.

Any written response, testimony, or documents obtained by the attorney general pursuant to this section, or any information derived directly or indirectly from such written response, testimony, or documents, shall not be admissible in evidence in any criminal prosecution against the person providing the written response, testimony, or documents. The provisions of this subsection (3) shall not be construed to prevent any law enforcement officer, having an independent basis therefor, from producing or obtaining the same or similar facts, information, or evidence for use in any criminal prosecution.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the attorney general from disclosing information obtained pursuant to this section to any other law enforcement agency or department of any governmental or public entity of this or any other state or to the federal government if such other law enforcement agency or department executes an agreement that such information will remain confidential and will not be used in any criminal prosecution against the person providing the written response, testimony, or documents.

If any person fails to appear or fails to cooperate with any investigation or inquiry pursuant to a request or subpoena issued pursuant to this section, the attorney general may apply to any district court for an appropriate order to effect the purposes of this section. The application shall state that there is reasonable cause to believe that the order applied for is necessary to investigate, prosecute, or terminate a violation of this article. If the court is satisfied that reasonable cause exists, the court may:

Require the attendance of, or the production of documents by, such person, or both;

Assess a civil penalty of up to five thousand dollars for such failure to appear and answer questions, written or otherwise, or such failure to produce documents unless the court finds that the failure to appear, to answer questions, or to produce documents was substantially justified or that other circumstances make an assessment of a civil penalty unjust;

Award the attorney general reasonable costs and attorney fees in making this application unless the court finds that the failure to appear, to answer questions, or to produce documents was substantially justified or that other circumstances make an award of costs and attorney fees unjust;

Enter any protective order as provided for in the Colorado rules of civil procedure; and

Grant such other or further relief as may be necessary to obtain compliance by such person.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 239, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

IP(1) amended, p. 245, § 4, effective March 30.

6-4-111. Enforcement by the attorney general.

The attorney general shall have the authority to institute actions or proceedings to prevent or restrain violations of this article.

The attorney general may bring a civil action on behalf of any governmental or public entity, with the written consent of such entity, injured, either directly or indirectly, in its business or property by reason of any violation of this article and, if successful, shall recover any actual damages sustained by such entity. If the violation alleged and proved is determined by the court to be a per se violation of this article, the attorney general may recover three times the actual damages sustained by such entity.

The attorney general may bring a civil action as parens patriae on behalf of natural persons residing within the state injured in their business or property by reason of any violation of this article and, if successful, shall recover any actual damages sustained by such natural persons. If the violation alleged and proved is determined by the court to be a per se violation of this article, the attorney general may recover three times the actual damages sustained by such natural persons.

In any parens patriae action brought pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), the attorney general shall cause notice to be given to the proposed parens group by publication or as otherwise directed by the court, and all proposed parens group members shall have the right to elect to have their particular claim excluded from that proceeding. No dismissal or compromise settlement of an action brought by the attorney general as parens patriae shall be entered without the approval of the court and notice to all proposed parens group members.

In any parens patriae action in which actual or treble damages are recovered, the court, in its discretion, may determine that the amount of damages recovered is too small to make a refund to parens group members practicable. In that event, the court may direct such damages to be paid to the general fund of the state or to some other governmental or public entity as the court deems appropriate or may require that damages be paid as rebates or price reductions to future consumers.

In any action brought pursuant to this section, the attorney general, if successful, shall be entitled to recover the costs of investigation, expert fees, costs of the action, and reasonable attorney fees.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 241, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1574, § 4, effective July 1.

6-4-112. Civil penalties.

The attorney general may bring a civil action on behalf of the state to seek the imposition of a civil penalty for any violation of this article. The court, upon finding a violation of this article, shall impose a civil penalty to be paid to the general fund of the state in an amount not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars for each such violation; except that the election by the attorney general to seek a civil penalty shall preclude the attorney general from filing criminal charges against the person assessed a civil penalty based upon the same conduct or from pursuing an action against such person for damages pursuant to section 6-4-111 (2) and (3).

In determining the amount of a civil penalty, the court shall consider, among other things: The nature and extent of the violation; the number of consumers affected by the violation; whether the violation was an isolated incident or a continuous pattern and practice of behavior; whether the violation was the result of willful conduct; whether the defendant took affirmative steps to conceal such violations; and whether, given the size and wealth of the defendant, the civil penalty will be an effective deterrent against future violations.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 242, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1574, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-054), ch. 138, p. 597, § 2, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 6-4-107, as it existed prior to 1992.

6-4-113. Enforcement - injunction.

Any person injured in its business or property by reason of any violation of this article may file an action to prevent or restrain any such violation.

In any action brought pursuant to this section, the court, in its discretion, may award the prevailing party its expert witness fees, the costs of the action, and reasonable attorney fees.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 242, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 6-4-105, as it existed prior to 1992.

6-4-114. Enforcement - civil damages.

Any person injured in its business or property by reason of any violation of this article may sue therefor and, if successful, shall recover any actual damages sustained by such person. If the violation alleged and proved is determined by the court to be a per se violation of this article, such person may recover three times the actual damages sustained by such person.

In any action brought pursuant to this section, the court, in its discretion, may award the prevailing party its expert fees, the costs of the action, and reasonable attorney fees.

No damages, costs, expert fees, costs of investigation, civil penalties, or attorney fees may be recovered from a governmental or public entity, or from any official, agent, or employee thereof acting in an official capacity, or from any person based on any official action directed by such governmental or public entity.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 242, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 6-4-108, as it existed prior to 1992.

6-4-115. Notice to the attorney general.

Any person who files a civil action which includes any allegation of a violation of this article shall, simultaneously with the filing of such action in district court, serve a copy of said complaint on the attorney general.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 243, § 1, effective July 1.

6-4-116. Computation of damages.

In any action brought pursuant to sections 6-4-111 and 6-4-114, the amount of damages may be calculated and assessed in the aggregate by statistical or sampling methods, by the computation of illegal overcharges, or by such other reasonable system of estimating aggregate damages as the court in its discretion may permit without the necessity of separately proving the individual claim of, or amount of damages to, persons on whose behalf the action was brought.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 243, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 6-4-108, as it existed prior to 1992.

6-4-117. Enforcement - criminal proceedings.

The attorney general shall prosecute all criminal proceedings for violations of this article, whether by indictment or direct information filed in the appropriate district court.

Any natural person who violates section 6-4-104, 6-4-105, or 6-4-106 commits a class 5 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

Any person, other than a natural person and a governmental or public entity, that violates section 6-4-104, 6-4-105, or 6-4-106 is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one million dollars.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 243, § 1,

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1466, § 15, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 6-4-104, as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

6-4-118. Statute of limitations.

Any civil action commenced pursuant to this article shall be brought within four years from the date that such cause of action accrued. For purposes of this article, a cause of action accrues when the circumstances giving rise to the cause of action are discovered or should have been discovered in the exercise of reasonable diligence.

Any criminal proceeding brought pursuant to this article shall be commenced within six years after the act complained of occurred.

If any proceeding or action is commenced by the attorney general for any violation of this article, the running of the statute of limitations with respect to every cause of action based in whole or in part on any matter complained of therein shall be suspended during the pendency thereof and for one year thereafter.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 243, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 6-4-104, as it existed prior to 1992.

6-4-119. Interpretation.

It is the intent of the general assembly that, in construing this article, the courts shall use as a guide interpretations given by the federal courts to comparable federal antitrust laws.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 244, § 1, effective July 1.

6-4-120. Remedies - cumulative.

The remedies provided in this article are cumulative except as otherwise expressly limited.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 244, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 6-5-114, as it existed prior to 1992.

6-4-121. Void contracts - refund.

All contracts or agreements made by any person while a member of any combination, conspiracy, trust, or pool prohibited under this article which are founded upon, or are the result of, or grow out of, or are connected with any violation of this article, either directly or indirectly, shall be void, and no recovery thereon or benefit therefrom shall be had by or for any such person. Any payments made upon, under, or pursuant to such contract or agreement to or for the benefit of such person may be recovered in an action by the party making the payment or his heirs, personal representatives, or assigns.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 244, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 6-4-106, as it existed prior to 1992.

6-4-122. Severability.

If any provision of this article or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 244, § 1, effective July 1.